Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 414.764 is amended to read:
414.764. (1) The Oregon Health Authority may reimburse a pharmacist  or pharmacy for any
health service:
(a) Provided to a medical assistance recipient who  is not enrolled in a coordinated care organ-
ization or a prepaid managed care health services organization;
(b) That is within the lawful scope of practice of a pharmacist; and
(c) If the authority determines the service is within the types and extent of  health care and
services to be provided to medical assistance recipients under ORS 414.065.
(2) A coordinated care organization may reimburse a pharmacist or pharmacy for any health
service:
(a) Provided to a medical  assistance recipient who is enrolled in the coordinated care organ-
ization or a prepaid managed care health services  organization that enters into a clinical pharmacy
agreement with the pharmacist or pharmacy; and
(b) That is within the lawful scope of practice of a pharmacist.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority and  a coordinated care organization shall reimburse a
pharmacist or pharmacy, in the same manner as  would be provided to any other health care
provider, for:
(a) The prescription, dispensation and  administration of preexposure and post-exposure
prophylactic antiretroviral therapies pursuant to ORS 689.645 and 689.704; and
(b) The service provided by the pharmacist.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2942 (HB 2942-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2942 (HB 2942-INTRO) Page 2